parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/lex-org.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8	[€äàáâ]
!# CONTENT:     organisation and business names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    PORTUGUESE
!#
!# CREATED:	14-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# OLD/tmp.org
!# OLD/tmp.soc
!# ADD/lexLocation.xip
!#
!# MARKERS 
!# !! = in both sources
!# !* = from old FSTs
!# ============================================================================
!# NOTE: names from XIP lexicons are  missing gender ("XSG")
!# 	 may require further classification
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols

+Noun +Prop +Adj 

+Company
+Instit
+Org
+Soc
+Admin
+AdminArea
+Party
+Paper


+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Postmod
+Acron +Abbr


! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space

^]	! lemma boundary (for inflecting proper names)



!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT 
INESC+Prop+Org+Acron			MSG;	!*	!=Instituto% de% Engenharia% de% Sistemas% e% Computadores
Incra+Prop+Org+Acron			MSG;	!*	!=Instituto% Nacional% de% Colonização% e% Reforma% Agrária
JNICT+Prop+Org+Acron			FSG;	!*	!=Junta% Nacional% de% Investigação% Científica% e% Tecnológica
PDC+Prop+Org				MSG;	!*
Pds+Prop+Org				MSG;	!*
PL+Prop+Org				MSG;	!*
PSN+Prop+Org				MSG;	!*
PSP+Prop+Org				FSG;	!*
WorldWideWeb+Prop+Org			FSG;	!*
WWW+Prop+Org+Acron			FSG;	!*	!=World% Wide% WebAeros+Prop+Soc	MSG;
BC+Prop+Soc+Acron			MSG;	!*	!=Banco% Central
BB+Prop+Soc+Acron			MSG;	!*	!=Banco% do% Brasil
Cacex+Prop+Soc				FSG;	!*
CCP+Prop+Soc+Acron			FSG;	!*	!=Câmara% de% Comércio% Portuguesa
CP+Prop+Soc+Acron			MSG;	!*	!=Caminho% de% Ferro% Português
Chevrolet+Prop+Soc			FSG;	!*
Cine% Acción+Prop+Soc			MSG;	!*
CNN+Prop+Soc				FSG;	!*
Coca% Cola+Prop+Soc			FSG;	!*
Corinthians+Prop+Soc			MSG;	!*
Criciúma+Prop+Soc			MSG;	!*
CSA+Prop+Soc				MSG;	!*
Fiat+Prop+Soc				FSG;	!*
FGTS+Prop+Soc+Acron			MSG;	!*	!=Fundo% de% Garantia% por% Tempo% de% Serviço
Inamps+Prop+Soc				MSG;	!*
Ibope+Prop+Soc+Acron			FSG;	!*	!=Instituto% Brasileiro% de% Opinião% Pública% e% Estatística
IPC+Prop+Soc+Acron			MSG;	!*	!=Instituto% de% Pensões% dos% Congressistas
Inter+Prop+Soc				MSG;	!*
Le% Baron% Hotel+Prop+Soc		MSG;	!*
MGM+Prop+Soc+Acron			FSG;	!*	!=Metro% Goldwyn% Mayer
Miami% Leasing+Prop+Soc			FSG;	!*
Nasa+Prop+Soc				FSG;	!*
Olivetti+Prop+Soc			FSG;	!*
Racing+Prop+Soc				MSG;	!*
Rank+Prop+Soc				FSG;	!*
Rank% Xerox+Prop+Soc			FSG;	!*
Sudene+Prop+Soc				FSG;	!*
Sunab+Prop+Soc				FSG;	!*
Telepac+Prop+Soc			FSG;	!*
TV-Rio+Prop+Soc				FSG;	!*
Usiminas+Prop+Soc			FSG;	!*
ONU+Prop+Org+Admin+Acron	FSG;
Nações% Unidas+Prop+Org+Admin	FPL;
U.E.+Prop+Org+Admin+Acron	FSG;
ASEAN+Prop+Org+Admin+Acron	FSG;
Mercosul+Prop+Org+Admin		MSG;
FMI+Prop+Org+Admin+Acron	MSG;
opep+Prop+Org+Admin+Acron	FSG;
Knesset+Prop+Org+Admin		FSG;
MEC+Prop+Org+Admin+Acron	MSG; 
NATO+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
OMI+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
CIA+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
FBI+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		MSG;
UNICEF+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
ANC+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
PALOP+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron			MPL;	!*	!=Países% Africanos% de% Língua% Oficial% Portuguesa
MFA+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
MPLA+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
FRELIMO+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		MSG;	!*	!=Frente% de% Libertação% de% Moçambique
Renamo+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
Farc+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
UEFA+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
Benfica+Prop+Org+Instit			MSG;
Celtic+Prop+Org+Instit			MSG;
Fiorentina+Prop+Org+Instit		MSG;
Batasuna+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;
CDS+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;
CDS/PP+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;
DEM+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;	! Democratas (Brasil)
MDP-CDE+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		FSG;
MPT+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		XSG;
MRPP+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;
PCdoB+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;   ! Partico Comunista do Brasil
PCTP-MRPP+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;
PAIGC+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;	!*
PMDB+Prop+Org+Instit+Party+Acron	MSG;	!*	!=Partido% do% Movimento% Democrático% Brasileiro
PSB+Prop+Org+Instit+Party+Acron		MSG;	!*	!=Partido% Socialista% Brasileiro
PPD/PSD+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;
PRT+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;
PSDB+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;	!*   Partido da Social Democracia Brasileira
PTdoB+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;	!* Partido Trabalhisa do Brasil 
PR+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;	!*      ! Partido da Républica
PSOE+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;
PSF+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;
UDF+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		FSG;
UMP+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		FSG;
MoDEM+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		MSG;
LO+Prop+Org+Instit+Party		FSG;
Labor% Party+Prop+Instit+Org+Party	MSG;
Partido% Popular+Prop+Instit+Org+Party		MSG;
Partido% Social% Democrata+Prop+Instit+Org+Party	MSG;
Unicamp+Prop+Org+Instit			FSG;	!*
PSP+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
Correios+Prop+Org+Instit		MPL;
CTT+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		MPL;
ONG+Prop+Org+Instit+Acron		FSG;
3M+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
Abrigada+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
Adecco+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Antalis+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
AT&T+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;	!*
Avipronto+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
BNH+Prop+Org+Company+Acron		MSG;	!*	!=Banco% Nacional% de% Habitação
CGD+Prop+Org+Company+Acron		FSG;   ! bank
Bosch+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Cargill+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Cimaca+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Comar+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Den+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Elektro+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Eurospuma+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Fitor+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Grundfos+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
IBM+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
Iichiko+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Kaizen+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Licrosoft+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Martifer+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Montblanc+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Nikka+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Orbitall+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Plasteme+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Prosegur+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
Publicar+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Rexel+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Schweppes+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Sogral+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Subergal+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Tissot+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Universal+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Zara+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
Euroatlantic% Airways% -% Transportes% Aéreos+Prop+Org+Company	FSG;
Portugália% -% C.ª% Portuguesa% de% Transportes% Aéreos+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
TAP% Portugal+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
TAP+Prop+Org+Company			FSG;
TAM+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!*
3M% Co.+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
Adega% Cooperativa% de% Almeirim+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Alfa% Romeo+Prop+Org+Company			FSG;
Álvaro% Cunha% &% C.ª+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
ASML% Holding% NV+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
BCD% Travel% -% Agência% de% Viagens+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Brother% Industries+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Centrocar% -% Centro% de% Equip.% Mecânicos+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
CNH% Latin% America+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Contacto% -% Soc.% de% Construções+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Dairy% Crest% Group% PLC+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Edifer% -% Const.% Pires% Coelho% &% Fernandes+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
ERG% SpA+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Farmoeste% -% Distribuidora% Farm.% do% Oeste+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Freitas% &% Silva+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
General% Motors+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
GKN% PLC+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Hoken% International+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Indian% Petrochemicals% Corp.% Ltd.% (IPCL)+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Jerónimo% Martins+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Kia% Motors% Corp.+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
Kuhne% &% Nagel+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Lojas% Renner+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Maple% Leaf% Foods+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Mila% Scheon+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Navegação% Aérea% de% Portugal% -% Nave% Portugal,% E.P.E.+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Novadelta% -% Com.% e% Ind.% de% Cafés+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Panrico% -% Produtos% Alimentares+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Portucel% -% Emp.% Produtora% de% Pasta% e% Papel+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Radiotelevisão% Portuguesa% -% Serviço% Público% de% Televisão+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Roca% -% Cerâmica% e% Com.+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Sanindusa% -% Indústria% de% Sanitários+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Servilimpe% -% Limpezas% Técnicas% Mecanizadas+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Soc.% de% Construções% Soares% da% Costa+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
St.% Dupont+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Sun% do% Brasil+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
Sun+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;
Teck% Cominco+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Torrefacção% Camelo+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
USG% Corp.+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
Wistron% Corp.+Prop+Org+Company		XSG;
24% Horas+Prop+Paper+Company		MSG;
Canal% de% Negócios+Prop+Paper+Company		MSG;
Daily% News+Prop+Paper+Company			MSG;	!*
DN+Prop+Paper+Company+Acron			MSG;	!*	!=Diário% de% Notícias
Diário% Económico+Prop+Paper+Company		MSG;
Expresso+Prop+Paper+Company		MSG;
Frankfurter% Rundschau+Prop+Paper+Company	MSG;
Jornal% de% Notícias+Prop+Paper+Company		MSG;
Le% Monde+Prop+Paper+Company			MSG;
O% Interior+Prop+Paper+Company		MSG;
O% Setubalense+Prop+Paper+Company		MSG;
Primeiro% de% Janeiro+Prop+Paper+Company	MSG;
Record+Prop+Paper+Company		MSG;
The% Observer+Prop+Paper+Company	MSG;	!*
TV-Magazine+Prop+Paper+Company			MSG;	!*
France-Presse+Prop+Paper+Company 	FSG;	!*
Lusa+Prop+Paper+Company			FSG;	!*
